Montana, session 2025, HB823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 20-7-330, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-330. Creation of state plan committee -- meetings -- report. (1) (a) The commissioner of
higher education and the superintendent of public instruction shall form a state plan committee as necessary to
update the state plan for career and technical education as required by 20 U.S.C. 2301.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction and the commissioner of higher education shall each
appoint three people from their respective advisory boards to serve on a committee to review and update the 5-
year state plan for career and technical education as required by 20 U.S.C. 2323. Two members appointed
from each advisory board must be educators, and the remaining member appointed from each advisory board
must be a representative of a business or community interest to serve on the state plan committee as follows:
(i) two educators; and
(ii) one representative of a business or community interest.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint three people to serve on the state plan
committee as follows:
(i) two educators; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 823
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 823
(ii) one representative of a business or community interest.
(d) The commissioner of labor and industry shall appoint two people to serve on the state plan
committee as follows:
(i) the executive director or the board chair of the Montana state workforce innovation board
provided for in 53-2-1203; and
(ii) one representative of the labor community.
(2) (a) At least four times a year, the board of regents shall meet with the superintendent of
public instruction, At least three times a year, the commissioner of higher education and the superintendent of
public instruction shall meet with the commissioner of labor and industry, teachers, students, labor
organizations, businesses, and institutions or agencies involved in vocational and technical education. The
meetings must take place during a regular meeting of each of the following entities:
(i) the board of regents;
(ii) the board of public education; and
(iii) the state workforce innovation board.
(b) During the meetings required under subsection (2)(a), the state plan committee shall, at a
minimum to:
(a)(i) discuss the state plan;
(b)(ii) identify any issues or concerns with the administration in Montana of the Carl D. Perkins
Career and Technical Education Improvement Act of 2006 Strengthening Career and Technical Education for
the 21st Century Act of 2018 in Montana;
(c)(iii) identify the needs of technical students, employers, and career programs in Montana and
determine the best way to meet those needs; and
(d)(iv) if necessary, make changes in the administration and operation in Montana of the Carl D.
Perkins Career and Technical Education Improvement Act of 2006 Strengthening Career and Technical
Education for the 21st Century Act of 2018 in Montana.
(3) If the state plan committee submits a new or revised 4-year state plan in accordance with
subsection (2)(b)(iv), the plan must be written to coordinate with or to be included in the federal Workforce
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 823
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 823
Innovation and Opportunity Act combined state plan as provided in 53-2-1205.
(3)(4) The board of regents shall report the results of the meetings required in subsection (2) to the
legislature in accordance with the provisions of 5-11-210."
Section 2. Directions to code commissioner. Whenever a reference to "5-year state plan for career
and technical education reports" appears in Title 5 or Title 20 and in all law enacted by the 69th legislature, the
code commissioner is directed to change it to a reference to "4-year state plan for career and technical
education reports".
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 823
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 823, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 823
INTRODUCED BY B. BARKER, C. SCHOMER, D. BEDEY, E. BUTTREY, G. HUNTER, L. JONES, C.
SPRUNGER, K. SEEKINS-CROWE, J. LYNCH
AN ACT REVISING THE STATE PLAN COMMITTEE; ADDING MEMBERS TO THE STATE PLAN
COMMITTEE; AUTHORIZING THE COMMISSIONER OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY TO
APPOINT MEMBERS TO THE STATE PLAN COMMITTEE; COORDINATING THE MEETING OF THE STATE
PLAN COMMITTEE WITH THE BOARD OF REGENTS, THE BOARD OF PUBLIC EDUCATION, AND THE
MONTANA STATE WORKFORCE INNOVATION BOARD; REQUIRING THE STATE PLAN COMMITTEE TO
COORDINATE WITH THE PERKINS STATE PLAN IN THE WORKFORCE INNOVATION AND OPPORTUNITY
ACT COMBINED STATE PLAN; AND AMENDING SECTION 20-7-330, MCA.”